Georgia, session 2025_26, HB379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 15-19-14 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to liens for
services rendered, priority, modes of enforcement, and other rights, is amended by adding
a new subsection to read as follows:
"(g) This Code section shall not authorize an attorney to encumber property awarded to an
adverse party in an action for divorce."
H. B. 379
- 1 -

LC 48 1454
SECTION 2.
Chapter 1 of Title 19 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to injunctions and
restraining orders authorized in domestic relations actions, is amended in Code
Section 19-1-1, relating to injunctions and restraining orders authorized in domestic relations
actions, by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (b) as follows:
"(1) Upon notice to the parties and the judge before whom the domestic relations action
is pending, binds the parties in such action, their agents, including their attorneys and
their former attorneys, servants, and employees, and all other persons acting in concert
with such parties;"
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 379
- 2 -